Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2157.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1859. Governance of Schools and Institutes.--(a) No later than three years after the effective date of this subsection, the administration, governance, operation and management of a school or an institute under this subarticle shall be transferred to a governance board.(b) The membership of a governance board shall consist of a minimum of five members who are approved by the department. A member may not be an individual who is:(1) a member of a board of school directors;1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) a member of an employe organization;(3) an employe of a school district; or(4) a public official.(c) The department shall establish policies and procedures for the submission and approval of members to a governance board. The following shall apply:(1) The policies and procedures shall require the department to consider whether the individual submitted for approval adequately represents any of the following:(i) The trades, industries and businesses located within the local workforce development area established in accordance with the act of December 18, 2001 (P.L.949, No.114), known as the Workforce Development Act, which encompasses the physical location of the school or institute.(ii) The staff of the school or institute.(iii) The parents or guardians of students enrolled in and attending the school or institute.(2) The policies and procedures shall require the department to consider whether the individual submitted for approval is adequately qualified for the administration, governance, operation and management of a school or an institute.(3) The policies and procedures shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) An individual submitted for approval shall be subject to a public hearing.(5) An individual submitted for approval shall be approved or denied within sixty days of the submission.(d) Upon approval, members of a governance board shall serve for a four-year term, commencing the day of their approval. The length of the terms of office of the initial members shall be 20260HB2157PN2791 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determined by the casting of lots in accordance with the following:(1) The terms of office of one-fourth of the members shall expire at the end of the first year.(2) The terms of office of one-fourth of the members shall expire at the end of the second year.(3) The terms of office of one-fourth of the members shall expire at the end of the third year.(4) The terms of office of the remaining one-fourth of the members shall expire at the end of the fourth year.(e) A governance board shall have all authority necessary for the administration, governance, operation and management of a school or an institute, including the authority and duties under section 1850.1(b).(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide any additional authority to a school district or an employe organization.(g) A governance board shall be considered a local agency under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(h) A governance board shall be considered an agency under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Employe organization" means as defined in section 1101-A."Public official" means as defined in 65 Pa.C.S. § 1102 (relating to definitions).20260HB2157PN2791 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2157PN2791 - 4 - 1